NLP/utils/brazilian_portuguese_dictionary/dictionaries/pt-BR-antigo.aff
SFX Y Y 130
SFX Y   r               va/PL                   ar
SFX Y   r               vas/PL                  ar
SFX Y   ar              ávamos/PL               ar
SFX Y   ar              áveis/PL                ar
SFX Y   r               vam/PL                  ar
SFX Y   ar              ei/PL                   [^cçg]ar
SFX Y   car             quei/PL                 car
SFX Y   gar             guei/PL                 gar
SFX Y   çar             cei/PL                  çar
SFX Y   r               ste/PL                  ar
SFX Y   ar              ou/PL                   ar
SFX Y   ar              ámos/PL                 ar
SFX Y   r               stes/PL                 ar
SFX Y   0               am/PL                   ar
SFX Y   0               a/PL                    ar
SFX Y   0               as/PL                   ar
SFX Y   ar              áramos/PL               ar
SFX Y   ar              áreis/PL                ar
SFX Y   0               am/PL                   ar
SFX Y   0               ei/PL                   ar
SFX Y   0               ás/PL                   ar
SFX Y   0               á/PL                    ar
SFX Y   0               emos/PL                 ar
SFX Y   0               eis/PL                  ar
SFX Y   0               ão/PL                   ar
SFX Y   r               sse/PL                  ar
SFX Y   r               sses/PL                 ar
SFX Y   ar              ássemos/PL              ar
SFX Y   ar              ásseis/PL               ar
SFX Y   r               ssem/PL                 ar
SFX Y   0               es/PL                   ar
SFX Y   0               mos/PL                  ar
SFX Y   0               des/PL                  ar
SFX Y   0               em/PL                   ar
SFX Y   0               ia/PL                   ar
SFX Y   0               ias/PL                  ar
SFX Y   0               íamos/PL                ar
SFX Y   0               íeis/PL                 ar
SFX Y   0               iam/PL                  ar
SFX Y   r               ndo/PL                  ar
SFX Y   r               do/PL                   ar
SFX Y   r               da/PL                   ar
SFX Y   r               dos/PL                  ar
SFX Y   r               das/PL                  ar
SFX Y   er              ia/PL                   er
SFX Y   er              ias/PL                  er
SFX Y   er              íamos/PL                er
SFX Y   er              íeis/PL                 er
SFX Y   er              iam/PL                  er
SFX Y   er              i/PL                    er
SFX Y   r               ste/PL                  er
SFX Y   r               u/PL                    er
SFX Y   r               mos/PL                  er
SFX Y   r               stes/PL                 er
SFX Y   0               am/PL                   er
SFX Y   0               a/PL                    er
SFX Y   0               as/PL                   er
SFX Y   er              êramos/PL               er
SFX Y   er              êreis/PL                er
SFX Y   0               am/PL                   er
SFX Y   0               ei/PL                   er
SFX Y   0               ás/PL                   er
SFX Y   0               á/PL                    er
SFX Y   0               emos/PL                 er
SFX Y   0               eis/PL                  er
SFX Y   0               ão/PL                   er
SFX Y   r               sse/PL                  er
SFX Y   r               sses/PL                 er
SFX Y   er              êssemos/PL              er
SFX Y   er              êsseis/PL               er
SFX Y   r               ssem/PL                 er
SFX Y   0               es/PL                   er
SFX Y   0               mos/PL                  er
SFX Y   0               des/PL                  er
SFX Y   0               em/PL                   er
SFX Y   0               ia/PL                   er
SFX Y   0               ias/PL                  er
SFX Y   0               íamos/PL                er
SFX Y   0               íeis/PL                 er
SFX Y   0               iam/PL                  er
SFX Y   r               ndo/PL                  er
SFX Y   er              ido/PL                  er
SFX Y   er              ida/PL                  er
SFX Y   er              idos/PL                 er
SFX Y   er              idas/PL                 er
SFX Y   ever            ito/PL                  crever
SFX Y   ever            ita/PL                  crever
SFX Y   ever            itos/PL                 crever
SFX Y   ever            itas/PL                 crever
SFX Y   r               a/PL                    ir
SFX Y   r               as/PL                   ir
SFX Y   ir              íamos/PL                ir
SFX Y   ir              íeis/PL                 ir
SFX Y   r               am/PL                   ir
SFX Y   ir              i/PL                    ir
SFX Y   r               ste/PL                  ir
SFX Y   r               u/PL                    ir
SFX Y   r               mos/PL                  ir
SFX Y   r               stes/PL                 ir
SFX Y   0               am/PL                   ir
SFX Y   0               a/PL                    ir
SFX Y   0               as/PL                   ir
SFX Y   ir              íramos/PL               ir
SFX Y   ir              íreis/PL                ir
SFX Y   0               am/PL                   ir
SFX Y   0               ei/PL                   ir
SFX Y   0               ás/PL                   ir
SFX Y   0               á/PL                    ir
SFX Y   0               emos/PL                 ir
SFX Y   0               eis/PL                  ir
SFX Y   0               ão/PL                   ir
SFX Y   r               sse/PL                  ir
SFX Y   r               sses/PL                 ir
SFX Y   ir              íssemos/PL              ir
SFX Y   ir              ísseis/PL               ir
SFX Y   r               ssem/PL                 ir
SFX Y   0               es/PL                   ir
SFX Y   0               mos/PL                  ir
SFX Y   0               des/PL                  ir
SFX Y   0               em/PL                   ir
SFX Y   0               ia/PL                   ir
SFX Y   0               ias/PL                  ir
SFX Y   0               íamos/PL                ir
SFX Y   0               íeis/PL                 ir
SFX Y   0               iam/PL                  ir
SFX Y   r               ndo/PL                  ir
SFX Y   r               do/PL                   ir
SFX Y   r               da/PL                   ir
SFX Y   r               dos/PL                  ir
SFX Y   r               das/PL                  ir
